Tennessee, session 114, HB0699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-509(d), is amended by deleting
the first sentence, which presently reads:
Correction of assessments pursuant to this section must be requested by the
taxpayer, or initiated by the assessor, prior to March 1, no more than the second year
following the tax year for which the correction is to be made.
and substituting instead:
Correction of assessments pursuant to this section must be requested by the
taxpayer, or initiated by the assessor, prior to March 1, no more than the tenth year
following the tax year for which the correction is to be made.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to assessments for the 2016 and subsequent tax years.
HB0699
000702
- 1 -